ja: リフトメカニズムタイプ: カウンターバランス; デュアルピストン; 電動モーター; ガスピストン; 油圧式; 手動式; スプリング; その他
el: Τύπος μηχανισμού ανύψωσης: Αντίβαρο; Διπλό έμβολο; Ηλεκτρικό μοτέρ; Έμβολο αερίου; Υδραυλικός; Χειροκίνητος; Ελατήριο; Άλλο
lt-LT: Keliamojo mechanizmo tipas: Atsvaras; Dvigubas stūmoklis; Elektrinis variklis; Dujinis stūmoklis; Hidraulinis; Rankinis; Spyruoklinis; Kita
pt-PT: Tipo de mecanismo de elevação: Contrapeso; Pistão duplo; Motor elétrico; Pistão a gás; Hidráulico; Manual; Mola; Outro
ru: Тип подъемного механизма: Противовес; Двойной поршень; Электродвигатель; Газовый поршень; Гидравлический; Ручной; Пружинный; Другое
sv: Typ av lyftmekanism: Motvikt; Dubbel kolv; Elmotor; Gaskolv; Hydraulisk; Manuell; Fjäder; Övrigt
tr: Kaldırma mekanizması türü: Karşı ağırlık; Çift piston; Elektrik motoru; Gazlı piston; Hidrolik; Manuel; Yay; Diğer
fr: Type de mécanisme de levage: Contrepoids; Double piston; Moteur électrique; Piston à gaz; Hydraulique; Manuel; Ressort; Autre
pt-BR: Tipo de mecanismo de elevação: Contrapeso; Pistão duplo; Motor elétrico; Pistão a gás; Hidráulico; Manual; Mola; Outro
nb: Type heismekanisme: Motvekt; Dobbelt stempel; Elektrisk motor; Gass-stempel; Hydraulisk; Manuell; Fjær; Annet
th: ประเภทกลไกการยก: น้ำหนักถ่วงดุล; ลูกสูบคู่; มอเตอร์ไฟฟ้า; ลูกสูบแก๊ส; ไฮดรอลิก; แมนนวล; สปริง; อื่นๆ
da: Liftmekanismetype: Modvægt; Dobbeltstempel; Elektrisk motor; Gasstempel; Hydraulisk; Manuel; Fjeder; Andet
es: Tipo de mecanismo de elevador: Contrapeso; Pistón doble; Motor eléctrico; Pistón de gas; Hidráulico; Manual; Resorte; Otro
it: Tipo di meccanismo di sollevamento: Contrappeso; A doppio pistone; Motore elettrico; Pistone a gas; Idraulico; Manuale; A molla; Altro
sk-SK: Typ zdvíhacieho mechanizmu: Protiváha; Dvojitý piest; Elektrický motor; Plynový piest; Hydraulický; Manuálny; Pružinový; Iné
fi: Nostimen mekanismityyppi: Vastapaino; Kaksoismäntä; Sähkömoottori; Kaasumäntä; Hydraulinen; Manuaalinen; Jousi; Muu
cs: Typ zvedacího mechanismu: Protiváha; Dvojitý píst; Elektrický motor; Plynový píst; Hydraulický; Manuální; Pružina; Jiné
hu: Emelőmechanizmus típusa: Ellensúlyos; Kétdugattyús; Elektromotoros; Gázdugattyús; Hidraulikus; Kézi; Rugós; Egyéb
en: Lift mechanism type: Counterbalance; Dual piston; Electric motor; Gas piston; Hydraulic; Manual; Spring; Other
nl: Type hefmechanisme: Contragewicht; Dubbele zuiger; Elektromotor; Gaszuiger; Hydraulisch; Handmatig; Veer; Overige
sl-SI: Vrsta dvižnega mehanizma: Protiutež; Dvojni bat; Električni motor; Plinski bat; Hidravlični; Ročni; Vzmet; Drugo
pl: Typ mechanizmu podnoszącego: Przeciwwaga; Dwutłokowy; Silnik elektryczny; Tłok gazowy; Hydrauliczny; Ręczny; Sprężynowy; Inne
bg-BG: Тип подемен механизъм: Противотежест; Двойно бутало; Електродвигател; Газово бутало; Хидравличен; Ръчен; Пружина; Друг
ro-RO: Tip de mecanism de ridicare: Contragreutate; Piston dublu; Motor electric; Piston cu gaz; Hidraulic; Manual; Arc; Altele
ko: 리프트 메커니즘 유형: 카운터밸런스; 이중 피스톤; 전기 모터; 가스 피스톤; 유압식; 수동; 스프링; 기타
vi: Loại cơ chế nâng: Đối trọng; Piston kép; Động cơ điện; Piston khí; Thủy lực; Thủ công; Lò xo; Khác
de: Hebemechanismus: Gegengewicht; Doppelkolben; Elektromotor; Gasdruckdämpfer; Hydraulisch; Manuell; Feder; Sonstige
zh-CN: 升降装置类型: 配重式; 双活塞; 电动机; 气动活塞; 液压; 手动; 弹簧; 其他
zh-TW: 升降機制類型: 配重平衡; 雙活塞; 電動馬達; 氣壓活塞; 液壓; 手動; 彈簧; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta mehanizma podizanja: Protuteža; Dvostruki klip; Elektromotor; Plinski klip; Hidraulički; Ručni; Opruga; Ostalo